Hawaii statutes.
[§134-2.5 Permits for motion picture films
or television program production.] (a) Upon a finding that public safety
is not endangered, the chief of police of the appropriate county may issue
permits, initially valid for a period of one year and renewable annually
thereafter, for the possession, transportation, or use, with blank cartridges,
of firearms or explosives solely as props for motion picture films or
television program production upon a showing that good cause exists for the
issuance of a permit to the applicant and upon sufficient proof of a federal
firearms license and a state film permit required under section 201-3. No
permit shall be issued to a person who is under twenty years of age or who is
disqualified under section 134-7.

(b) Applications for permits shall be in
writing, signed by the individual applicant or by a member or officer qualified
to sign if the applicant is a firm or corporation, and shall state the name,
business in which engaged, business address, and a full description of the use
to which the firearms or explosives are to be put, including the names of the
persons who will actually use the props. The application shall also require
the fingerprinting and photographing of the applicant. Applications and
permits shall be uniform throughout the State on forms prescribed by the
attorney general.

(c) The attorney general shall establish rules
pursuant to chapter 91 concerning security requirements for storing and
transporting firearms or explosives for which permits are issued. Permits
shall be issued only upon a showing of the applicant's ability to meet these
security requirements.

(d) A fee of $50 should be charged for each
permit issued under this section.

(e) Every applicant to whom a permit is issued
shall keep it on the applicant's person or at the place where the firearms or
explosives are stored. The permit, firearms and explosives, shall be available
for inspection by any law enforcement officer or any other person designated by
the respective chief of police.

(f) Every firearm or explosive for which a
permit is issued shall bear a unique identifying number. If the firearm or
explosive does not bear a unique identifying number, the chief of police of the
appropriate county shall assign a number that shall be stamped or placed
thereon.

(g) The chief of police of the respective
county shall revoke permits issued under this section any time it appears that
the holder of the permit has used the firearms or explosives for purposes other
than those allowed by the permit or that the holder of the permit has not
exercised great care in retaining custody of any firearms or explosive
possessed under the permit. [L 1988, c 272, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next